Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,104
Brand assigned to committee.

There is a recorded brand consisting of the alphabetical letter N on the entire right and left sides which is assigned to the Nebraska Brand Committee to be used only by authorized personnel of the brand committee to permanently identify livestock which are suspected of having been stolen and may be used as evidence in any court proceeding. It shall in no way signify that the brand committee (1) is the owner of livestock so branded or (2) claims ownership in any livestock carrying such brand. It shall only be construed and intended that livestock so branded are evidence or portions of evidence seized relative to an alleged theft of livestock.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 35.